Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202630-2302
Share of the spouse.

The intestate share of the surviving spouse is:

(1) if there is no surviving issue or parent of the decedent, the entire intestate estate;

(2) if there is no surviving issue but the decedent is survived by a parent or parents, the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus one-half of the balance of the intestate estate;

(3) if there are surviving issue all of whom are issue of the surviving spouse also, the first one hundred fifty thousand dollars, plus one-half of the balance of the intestate estate;

(4) if there are surviving issue one or more of whom are not issue of the surviving spouse, one-half of the intestate estate.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 24, UPC § 2-102;

Laws 1980, LB 694, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB35, § 19;

Laws 2026, LB838, § 15.
July 18, 2026